Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.740

Reimbursement for expenses.

All expenses of the department and the office of the state actuary related to the implementation of chapter 2, Laws of 2003 shall be reimbursed from the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system expense fund under RCW 39.34.130.

[ 2003 c 92 s 7.]